Louisiana, session 2026, HB1187.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:2297(D)(2), 2307(G), and 2317 are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 22:2292(A)(13) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2292. Definitions; personal property; option to exclude
A. As used in this Part, unless the context otherwise requires:
* * *
(13) "Excess emergency assessment monies" means monies derived from
emergency assessments levied pursuant to R.S. 22:2307 that are no longer required
to pay, secure, or otherwise satisfy bonds or other indebtedness payable from, or
secured by, emergency assessment revenues, together with any amounts required
under the related financing documents for fees, expenses, reserves, and similar
obligations.
* * *
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1187 ENROLLED
§2297. Powers and duties of Louisiana Citizens Property Insurance Corporation
* * *
D. The corporation shall:
* * *
(2) Retain any profits or excess reserves generated, to be used to offset
deficits incurred by the plans. Such retained funds shall be invested pursuant to the
limitations set forth in this Title for insurers, except for the purpose of funding the
Louisiana Fortify Homes Program, as provided for in R.S. 22:1483.1 and R.S.
22:2307.
* * *
§2307. Plan deficits; financing
* * *
G.(1) The corporation may pledge, assign, and grant a security interest in the
assessments, insurance and reinsurance recoverables, surcharges, and other funds
available to the corporation as the source of revenue for and to secure bonds or other
indebtedness, including without limitation lines of credit or other financing
mechanisms issued or created under this Subsection pursuant to the procedures of
Chapter 13 of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, R.S. 39:1421 et
seq., or to retire any other debt incurred as a result of deficits or events giving rise
to deficits, or in any other way that the governing board determines will efficiently
recover such deficits and use such funds to pay any current or other obligations on
the bonds or other indebtedness even if no event of default has occurred under the
bonds or other indebtedness. The purpose of the lines of credit or other financing
mechanisms is to provide additional resources to assist the corporation in covering
claims and expenses attributable to a catastrophe. As used in this Subsection, the
term "assessments" includes regular assessments under Subsection B or C of this
Section, and emergency assessments under Subsection E of this Section. Emergency
assessments collected under Subsection E of this Section are not part of an insurer's
rates, are not premium, and are not subject to premium tax, fees, or commissions.
However, failure to pay the emergency assessment shall be treated as failure to pay
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1187 ENROLLED
premium. The emergency assessments under Subsection E of this Section shall
continue to be levied and collected and shall be used to make any payments due with
respect to any bonds issued or other indebtedness incurred with respect to a deficit
for which the assessment was imposed remains outstanding, even if no event of
default has occurred under the bonds or other indebtedness, unless adequate
protection and provision has been made for the payment of such bonds or other
indebtedness pursuant to the documents governing such bonds or other indebtedness.
(2) After all bonds issued or other indebtedness incurred that are payable
from, secured by, or otherwise related to emergency assessments levied pursuant to
Subsection E of this Section have been paid in full or are no longer outstanding by
reason of defeasance or other legally effective provision for payment, any excess
emergency assessment monies may be retained for the payment of future debts or
used for the purposes and in the manner provided for in R.S. 22:2317(B), including
as funding for the Louisiana Fortify Homes Program, as provided in R.S. 22:1483.1.
* * *
§2317. Refund and use of certain assessments
A. At the time of issuance or annual renewal of a property insurance policy,
each insurer shall include the following with the policy sent to each insured:
(1) Information As applicable, information on the electronic link to the form
designated by the Department of Revenue to receive a refund from the state after its
payment by the insured pursuant to R.S. 47:6025(A)(3) for the amount of any
surcharge, market equalization charge, or other assessment levied by the corporation
pursuant to R.S. 22:2307 due to Hurricanes Katrina and Rita.
(2) A As applicable, a statement in fourteen-point or boldface type that any
surcharge, market equalization charge, or other assessment levied by the corporation
pursuant to R.S. 22:2307 due to Hurricanes Katrina and Rita is refundable.
B. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the corporation shall not
transfer, donate, expand, or otherwise dispose of emergency assessment monies for
purposes of this Subsection, unless and until all bonds or other indebtedness payable
from or secured by emergency assessment revenues have been paid in full or are no
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1187 ENROLLED
longer outstanding by reason of defeasance or other legally effective provision for
payment under the related financing documents.
C. Within ninety days of the provisions of Subsection B of this Section being
satisfied, the governing board of the corporation shall adopt a resolution certifying
the requirements of Subsection B of this Section have been satisfied and the amount,
if any, of excess emergency assessment monies and directing the transfer of such
monies for the purposes authorized pursuant R.S. 22:2307(G) and this Section.
D. Following certification pursuant to Subsection C of this Section, excess
emergency assessment monies may be transferred to the Louisiana Fortify Homes
Program Fund provided for in R.S. 22:1483.1, and such funds shall be used only for
the purposes authorized pursuant to R.S. 22:1483.1.
E. Following the certification required by Subsection C of this Section, the
corporation shall transfer excess emergency assessment monies, in accordance with
the resolution adopted by the board of directors, to the state treasurer for deposit into
the state treasury for deposit into the Louisiana Fortify Homes Program Fund, in
accordance with R.S. 22:1483.1, for the exclusive purpose of funding the Louisiana
Fortify Homes Program in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 22:1483.1.
F. The corporation may expend a reasonable amount of excess emergency
assessment monies to pay actual, necessary, and documented costs associated with
determining the excess emergency assessment monies, supporting the certification,
and effectuating the transfer of monies pursuant to the provisions of this Section.
The governing board shall approve such costs by resolution.
G. The corporation shall submit to the House and Senate committees on
insurance and shall post on its public website all of the following:
(1) The board resolution required pursuant to Subsection C of this Section.
(2) A report within sixty days of the transfer of monies pursuant to
Subsection E of this Section, stating the amount transferred, the administrative costs
paid in accordance with Subsection F of this Section, and the date of transfer.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1187 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.